Tennessee, session 114, HB1812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-216(a), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(a)
(1) A person commits the offense of assisted suicide who:
(A) Intentionally provides another person with the means by
which such person directly and intentionally brings about such person's
own death; or
(B) Intentionally participates in a physical act by which another
person directly and intentionally brings about such person's own death;
and
(C) Provides the means or participates in the physical act with:
(i) Actual knowledge that the other person intends to bring
about such person's own death; and
(ii) The clear intent that the other person bring about such
person's own death.
(2) A person commits the offense of assisted suicide who:
(A) Through any form of communication, intentionally advises or
encourages another person to commit suicide for the purpose of inciting,
persuading, or aiding the other person to commit or attempt to commit
suicide within an imminent period of time; and
HB1812
010559
- 1 -

(B) Knows that the other person has communicated an intent to
commit suicide.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-216(g), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(g)
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2), assisted suicide is a Class D
felony.
(2) If the victim of the offense is a minor, then assisted suicide is a Class
C felony.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts committed on or after that date.
- 2 - 010559